Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1725.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 5 of the act of June 1, 1956 (1955 P.L.1944, No.655), referred to as the Liquid Fuels Tax Municipal Allocation Law, is amended to read:Section 5. In order to qualify for its share of the moneys herein provided, each city, borough, town and township, shall[--]:(1) [Furnish] furnish evidence, annually, to the department that its treasurer is bonded in accordance with law;(2) [Submit] submit a report, on forms furnished by the 123456789101112131415161718192021 department, concerning the way or ways the funds provided in section one of this act shall be expended;(3) [Submit] submit a proper report, on forms furnished by the department, on the fifteenth day of January for the period ending December thirty-first each year, showing the cost of work done pursuant to the funds provided in section four clause (1) of this act;(4) [Establish] establish and maintain a special fund into which the moneys provided in section four clause (1) of this act shall be deposited and into which no other moneys may be deposited or comingled;(5) [Furnish] furnish evidence to the department that a tax to provide funds for road and street purpose is being levied for the year in which the allocation is made[.]; and(6) for the purchase of or contract for asphalt pavement to be used by the city, borough, town or township for road or street maintenance, allow recycled asphalt, including reclaimed asphalt pavement and recycled asphalt shingles, in such mixed use design as approved by regulation of the department. The department shall promulgate regulations that include at least:(i) the maximum allowed amount of reclaimed asphalt pavement and recycled asphalt shingles in mixed-use design on road or street maintenance;(ii) performance testing standards for mixtures containing reclaimed asphalt pavement and recycled asphalt shingles; and(iii) integration protocols for combining reclaimed asphalt pavement, recycled asphalt shingles and other recycled materials to ensure compatibility.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1725PN2125 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829